Florida, session 2026, SB1668.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 81 82 Section 1.âParagraph (a) of subsection (7) of section 83 409.910, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 84 409.910âResponsibility for payments on behalf of Medicaid 85 eligible persons when other parties are liable.â 86 (7)âThe agency shall recover the full amount of all medical 87 assistance provided by Medicaid on behalf of the recipient to 88 the full extent of third-party benefits. 89 (a)âRecovery of such benefits shall be collected directly 90 from: 91 1.âAny third party; 92 2.âThe recipient or legal representative, if he or she has 93 received third-party benefits; 94 3.âThe provider of a recipientâs medical services if third 95 party benefits have been recovered by the provider; 96 notwithstanding any provision of this section, to the contrary, 97 however, no provider shall be required to refund or pay to the 98 agency any amount in excess of the actual third-party benefits 99 received by the provider from a third-party payor for medical 100 services provided to the recipient; or 101 4.âAny person who has received the third-party benefits; or 102 5.âThe Florida Birth-Related Neurological Injury 103 Compensation Association for plan participant costs incurred 104 under s. 766.31. 105 106 The provisions of this subsection do not apply to any proceeds 107 received by the state, or any agency thereof, pursuant to a 108 final order, judgment, or settlement agreement, in any matter in 109 which the state asserts claims brought on its own behalf, and 110 not as a subrogee of a recipient, or under other theories of 111 liability. The provisions of this subsection do not apply to any 112 proceeds received by the state, or an agency thereof, pursuant 113 to a final order, judgment, or settlement agreement, in any 114 matter in which the state asserted both claims as a subrogee and 115 additional claims, except as to those sums specifically 116 identified in the final order, judgment, or settlement agreement 117 as reimbursements to the recipient as expenditures for the named 118 recipient on the subrogation claim. 119 Section 2.âSection 766.302, Florida Statutes, is reordered 120 and amended to read: 121 766.302âDefinitions; ss. 766.301-766.316.âAs used in ss. 122 766.301-766.316, the term: 123 (1)ââActuarially soundâ means that the total plan assets 124 available to fund future liabilities are equal to or greater 125 than 90 percent of the present value of total estimated 126 liabilities excluding any risk margin. 127 (2)(4)ââAdministrative law judgeâ means an administrative 128 law judge appointed by the division. 129 (3)(1)ââAssociationâ means the Florida Birth-Related 130 Neurological Injury Compensation Association established in s. 131 766.315 to administer the Florida Birth-Related Neurological 132 Injury Compensation Plan and the plan of operation established 133 in s. 766.314. 134 (4)(2)ââBirth-related neurological injuryâ means injury to 135 the brain or spinal cord of a live infant weighing at least 136 2,500 grams for a single gestation or, in the case of a multiple 137 gestation, a live infant weighing at least 2,000 grams at birth 138 caused by oxygen deprivation or mechanical injury occurring in 139 the course of labor, delivery, or resuscitation in the immediate 140 postdelivery period in a hospital, which renders the infant 141 permanently and substantially mentally and physically impaired. 142 This definition shall apply to live births only and does shall 143 not include disability or death caused by genetic or congenital 144 abnormality. 145 (5)(3)ââClaimantâ means any person who files a claim 146 pursuant to s. 766.305 for compensation for a birth-related 147 neurological injury to an infant. Such a claim may be filed by 148 any legal representative on behalf of an injured infant; and, in 149 the case of a deceased infant, the claim may be filed by an 150 administrator, personal representative, or other legal 151 representative thereof. 152 (6)(5)ââDivisionâ means the Division of Administrative 153 Hearings of the Department of Management Services. 154 (7)(9)ââFamily memberâ means a father, mother, or legal 155 guardian. 156 (8)(10)ââFamily residential or custodial careâ means care 157 normally rendered by trained professional attendants which is 158 beyond the scope of child care duties, but which is provided by 159 family members. Family members who provide nonprofessional 160 residential or custodial care may not be compensated under this 161 act for care that falls within the scope of child care duties 162 and other services normally and gratuitously provided by family 163 members. Family residential or custodial care shall be performed 164 only at the direction and control of a physician when such care 165 is medically necessary. Reasonable charges for expenses for 166 family residential or custodial care provided by a family member 167 shall be determined as follows: 168 (a)âIf the family member is not employed, the per-hour 169 value equals the federal minimum hourly wage. 170 (b)âIf the family member is employed and elects to leave 171 that employment to provide such care, the per-hour value of that 172 care shall equal the rates established by Medicaid for private 173 duty services provided by a home health aide. A family member or 174 a combination of family members providing care in accordance 175 with this definition may not be compensated for more than a 176 total of 10 hours per day. Family care is in lieu of 177 professional residential or custodial care, and no professional 178 residential or custodial care may be awarded for the period of 179 time during the day that family care is being provided. 180 (9)(6)ââHospitalâ means any hospital licensed in Florida. 181 (10)ââOfficeâ means the Office of Insurance Regulation. 182 (11)ââParticipantâ means the person who suffered a birth 183 related neurological injury as an infant and who accepted 184 compensation under the plan by final order entered by an 185 administrative law judge pursuant to s. 766.309. 186 (12)(7)ââParticipating physicianâ means a physician 187 licensed in Florida to practice medicine who practices 188 obstetrics or performs obstetrical services either full time or 189 part time and who had paid or was exempted from payment at the 190 time of the injury the assessment required for participation in 191 the birth-related neurological injury compensation plan for the 192 year in which the injury occurred. Such term does shall not 193 apply to any physician who practices medicine as an officer, 194 employee, or agent of the Federal Government. 195 (13)(8)ââPlanâ means the Florida Birth-Related Neurological 196 Injury Compensation Plan established under s. 766.303. 197 (14)ââRisk marginâ means an additional, explicit allowance 198 above the best-estimate reserve to reflect uncertainty in future 199 claim payments, including variations in claimant life expectancy 200 and the number and cost of pending or unreported claims. The 201 risk margin is not included in the reserve amount used to 202 calculate the funding ratio. 203 Section 3.âSection 766.303, Florida Statutes, is amended to 204 read: 205 766.303âFlorida Birth-Related Neurological Injury 206 Compensation Plan; exclusiveness of remedy.â 207 (1)âThere is established the Florida Birth-Related 208 Neurological Injury Compensation Plan for the purpose of 209 providing compensation, irrespective of fault, for birth-related 210 neurological injuries injury claims. Such plan shall apply to 211 births occurring on or after January 1, 1989, and shall be 212 administered by the Florida Birth-Related Neurological Injury 213 Compensation Association. 214 (2)âThe rights and remedies granted by this plan on account 215 of a birth-related neurological injury shall exclude all other 216 rights and remedies of such infant, her or his personal 217 representative, family members parents, dependents, and next of 218 kin, at common law or otherwise, against any person or entity 219 directly involved with the labor, delivery, or immediate 220 postdelivery resuscitation during which such injury occurs, 221 arising out of or related to a medical negligence claim with 222 respect to such injury; except that a civil action may shall not 223 be foreclosed where there is clear and convincing evidence of 224 bad faith or malicious purpose or willful and wanton disregard 225 of human rights, safety, or property, provided that such suit is 226 filed prior to and in lieu of payment of an award under ss. 227 766.301-766.316. Such suit shall be filed before the award of 228 the division becomes conclusive and binding as provided for in 229 s. 766.311. 230 (3)âSovereign immunity is hereby waived on behalf of the 231 Florida Birth-Related Neurological Injury Compensation 232 Association solely to the extent necessary to assure payment of 233 compensation as provided in s. 766.31. 234 (4)âThe association shall administer the plan in a manner 235 that promotes and protects the health and best interests of 236 participants children with birth-related neurological injuries. 237 Section 4.âSubsections (1) and (3) of section 766.305, 238 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 239 766.305âFiling of claims and responses; medical 240 disciplinary review.â 241 (1)âAll claims filed for compensation under the plan must 242 shall commence by the claimant filing with the division a 243 petition that includes all of seeking compensation. Such 244 petition shall include the following information: 245 (a)âThe name and address of the legal representative and 246 the basis for her or his representation of the injured infant. 247 (b)âThe name and address of the injured infant. 248 (c)âThe name and address of any physician providing 249 obstetrical services who was present at the birth and the name 250 and address of the hospital at which the birth occurred. 251 (d)âA description of the disability for which the claim is 252 made. 253 (e)âThe time and place the injury occurred. 254 (f)âA brief statement of the facts and circumstances 255 surrounding the injury and giving rise to the claim. 256 (3)âThe claimant shall furnish to the Florida Birth-Related 257 Neurological Injury Compensation association the following 258 information, which must be filed with the association within 10 259 days after the filing of the petition as set forth in subsection 260 (1): 261 (a)âAll available relevant medical records relating to the 262 birth-related neurological injury and a list identifying any 263 unavailable records known to the claimant and the reasons for 264 the recordsâ unavailability. 265 (b)âAppropriate assessments, evaluations, and prognoses and 266 such other records and documents as are reasonably necessary for 267 the determination of the amount of compensation to be paid to, 268 or on behalf of, the injured infant on account of the birth 269 related neurological injury. 270 (c)âDocumentation of expenses and services incurred to date 271 which identifies any payment made for such expenses and services 272 and the payor. 273 (d)âDocumentation of any applicable private or governmental 274 source of services or reimbursement relative to the impairments. 275 276 The information required by paragraphs (a)-(d) shall remain 277 confidential and exempt under the provisions of s. 766.315(6)(b) 278 s. 766.315(5)(b). 279 Section 5.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 280 766.309, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 281 766.309âDetermination of claims; presumption; findings of 282 administrative law judge binding on participants.â 283 (1)âThe administrative law judge shall make the following 284 determinations based upon all available evidence: 285 (a)âWhether the injury claimed is a birth-related 286 neurological injury. If the claimant has demonstrated, to the 287 satisfaction of the administrative law judge, that the infant 288 has sustained a brain or spinal cord injury caused by oxygen 289 deprivation or mechanical injury and that the infant was thereby 290 rendered permanently and substantially mentally and physically 291 impaired, a rebuttable presumption shall arise that the injury 292 is a birth-related neurological injury as defined in s. 766.302 293 s. 766.302(2). 294 Section 6.âSection 766.31, Florida Statutes, is amended to 295 read: 296 766.31âAdministrative law judge awards for birth-related 297 neurological injuries; notice of award.â 298 (1)âUpon determining that an infant has sustained a birth 299 related neurological injury and that obstetrical services were 300 delivered by a participating physician at the birth, the 301 administrative law judge shall make an award providing 302 compensation for the following items relative to such injury: 303 (a)âActual expenses incurred since the date of birth for 304 medically necessary and reasonable: 305 1.âMedical and hospital care and services;, 306 2.âHabilitative services; and training, 307 3.âDental services; 308 4.âFamily residential or custodial care;, 309 5.âProfessional residential care;, and 310 6.âProfessional custodial care; and service, 311 7.âfor medically necessary Drugs;, 312 8.âSpecial equipment;, and facilities, and 313 9.âfor Related travel. 314 (b)âAt a minimum, compensation must be provided for the 315 following actual expenses: 316 1.âPsychotherapeutic services for A total annual benefit of 317 up to $10,000 for immediate family members and other relatives 318 who have resided reside with the participant, which are infant 319 for psychotherapeutic services obtained from a psychiatrist 320 licensed under chapter 458 or chapter 459, a provider providers 321 licensed under chapter 490 or chapter 491, or a psychiatrist or 322 provider who has equivalent licensure by another jurisdiction. 323 This benefit for such family members and relatives shall be up 324 to a total of $10,000 annually during the participantâs lifetime 325 and up to a total of $20,000 subsequent to the participantâs 326 death. 327 2.âFor the life of the participant child, providing family 328 members parents or legal guardians with a reliable method of 329 transporting transportation for the care of the participant and 330 child or reimbursing the cost of upgrading an existing vehicle 331 to accommodate the participantâs wheelchair and medically 332 necessary equipment childâs needs when it becomes medically 333 necessary for wheelchair transportation. The mode of 334 transportation must take into account the special accommodations 335 required for the specific child. The plan may not limit such 336 transportation assistance based on the participantâs childâs age 337 or weight. The plan must replace any vehicle vans purchased by 338 the plan every 7 years or 150,000 miles, whichever comes first. 339 3.âHousing assistance of up to $100,000 for the life of the 340 participant child, including, but not limited to, a down payment 341 on a new home, moving expenses, and home construction and 342 modification costs. 343 4.âLegal costs associated with establishing and maintaining 344 guardianship for a participant. 345 (c)1.âThe costs of a health insurance policy or health 346 maintenance contract that provides major medical or similar 347 comprehensive health insurance coverage for the participant 348 obtained pursuant to subsection (3), including, but not limited 349 to, the premium and out-of-pocket costs. For participants 350 enrolled in the state Medicaid program, the plan must reimburse 351 fee-for-service paid claims and capitation payments, as 352 applicable, for services provided to such participants pursuant 353 to this section and for the administrative and support costs 354 associated with the provided medical assistance. Such funds 355 shall be credited to the Agency for Health Care Administrationâs 356 Medical Care Trust Fund. 357 2.âBy December 31, 2026, the plan shall reimburse any 358 participant for reasonable, medically necessary care received by 359 the participant on or before June 30, 2026, which was reduced or 360 not paid by the plan because such participant did not have 361 comprehensive or major medical health insurance coverage through 362 an insurer or a health maintenance organization. 363 (d)(b)âHowever, the following expenses are not subject to 364 compensation: 365 1.âExpenses for items or services that the participant 366 infant has received, or is entitled to receive, under the laws 367 of any state or the Federal Government, except to the extent 368 such exclusion may be prohibited by federal law. 369 2.âExpenses for items or services that the participant 370 infant has received, or is contractually entitled to receive, 371 from any prepaid health plan, health maintenance organization, 372 or other private insuring entity. 373 3.âExpenses for which the participant infant has received 374 reimbursement, or for which the participant infant is entitled 375 to receive reimbursement, under the laws of any state or the 376 Federal Government, except to the extent such exclusion may be 377 prohibited by federal law. 378 4.âExpenses for which the participant infant has received 379 reimbursement, or for which the participant infant is 380 contractually entitled to receive reimbursement, pursuant to the 381 provisions of any health or sickness insurance policy or other 382 private insurance program. 383 5.âExpenses for family residential or custodial care 384 provided by a family member while: 385 a.âCare and supervision of the participant is 386 simultaneously being provided by another person or entity; or 387 b.âThe family member receives compensation from another 388 source for work performed during the same time for which 389 compensation is sought from the association. 390 (e)(c)âExpenses included under paragraphs paragraph (a) and 391 (b) are limited to reasonable charges prevailing in the same 392 community for similar treatment of injured persons when such 393 treatment is paid for by the injured person. 394 (f)1.âA family member The parents or legal guardians 395 receiving benefits under the plan may file a petition with the 396 division of Administrative Hearings to dispute the amount of 397 actual expenses reimbursed or a denial of reimbursement. 398 2.âIn the case of an alleged overpayment of an expense 399 reimbursement by the association to a family member, if the 400 family member does not agree that an overpayment has occurred, 401 the association may file a petition for division review of the 402 overpayment for a determination of the amount, if any, to be 403 recouped by the association. 404 (g)1.(d)1.a.âPeriodic payments of an award to the family 405 members parents or legal guardians of the participant infant 406 found to have sustained a birth-related neurological injury, 407 which award may not exceed $100,000. However, at the discretion 408 of the administrative law judge, such award may be made in a 409 lump sum. Beginning on January 1, 2021, the award may not exceed 410 $250,000, and each January 1 thereafter, the maximum award 411 authorized under this paragraph shall increase by 3 percent. 412 b.âParents or legal guardians who received an award 413 pursuant to this section before January 1, 2021, must receive a 414 retroactive payment in an amount sufficient to bring the total 415 award paid to the parents or legal guardians pursuant to sub 416 subparagraph a. to $250,000. This additional payment may be made 417 in a lump sum or in periodic payments as designated by the 418 parents or legal guardians and must be paid by July 1, 2021. 419 2.a.âDeath benefit for the participant infant in an amount 420 of $50,000. 421 b. Parents or legal guardians who received an award 422 pursuant to this section, and whose child died since the 423 inception of the program, must receive a retroactive payment in 424 an amount sufficient to bring the total award paid to the 425 parents or legal guardians pursuant to sub-subparagraph a. to 426 $50,000. This additional payment may be made in a lump sum or in 427 periodic payments as designated by the parents or legal 428 guardians and must be paid by July 1, 2021. 429 (h)(e)âReasonable expenses incurred in connection with the 430 filing of a claim under ss. 766.301-766.316, including 431 reasonable attorney attorneyâs fees, which shall be subject to 432 the approval and award of the administrative law judge. In 433 determining an award for attorney attorneyâs fees, the 434 administrative law judge shall consider the following factors: 435 1.âThe time and labor required, the novelty and difficulty 436 of the questions involved, and the skill requisite to perform 437 the legal services properly. 438 2.âThe fee customarily charged in the locality for similar 439 legal services. 440 3.âThe time limitations imposed by the claimant or the 441 circumstances. 442 4.âThe nature and length of the professional relationship 443 with the claimant. 444 5.âThe experience, reputation, and ability of the lawyer or 445 lawyers performing services. 446 6.âThe contingency or certainty of a fee. 447 448 If there is Should there be a final determination of 449 compensability, and the claimants accept an award under this 450 section, the claimants are not liable for any expenses, 451 including attorney fees, incurred in connection with the filing 452 of a claim under ss. 766.301-766.316 other than those expenses 453 awarded under this section. 454 (2)âThe award shall require the immediate payment of 455 expenses previously incurred and shall require that future 456 expenses be paid as incurred. 457 (3)âA family member must continuously maintain a health 458 insurance policy or health maintenance contract that provides 459 comprehensive major medical health insurance coverage for the 460 participant. 461 (a)âIf the participant does not have such coverage at the 462 time of entry of a final order by an administrative law judge 463 approving a claim for compensation, the family member must 464 obtain coverage within 60 days after entry of such order or 465 apply for Medicaid coverage within 30 days after entry of such 466 order. 467 (b)âIf the participant is determined to be ineligible for 468 Medicaid, the family member must obtain other coverage within 60 469 days after receiving the Medicaid application denial. 470 (c)âA family member of an individual who is a participant 471 on June 30, 2026, must obtain the required coverage for the 472 participant by January 1, 2027. 473 (4)(3)âA copy of the award shall be sent immediately by 474 registered or certified mail to each person served with a copy 475 of the petition under s. 766.305(2). 476 Section 7.âSection 766.314, Florida Statutes, is amended to 477 read: 478 766.314âAssessments; plan of operation.â 479 (1)âThe assessments established under pursuant to this 480 section shall be used to finance the Florida Birth-Related 481 Neurological Injury Compensation Plan. 482 (2)âThe assessments and appropriations dedicated to the 483 plan shall be administered by the Florida Birth-Related 484 Neurological Injury Compensation Association established in s. 485 766.315, in accordance with the following requirements: 486 (a)âOn or before July 1, 1988, The directors of the 487 association shall submit to the office Department of Insurance 488 for review and approval a plan of operation and any amendment 489 thereto which shall provide for the efficient administration of 490 the plan and for prompt processing of claims against and awards 491 made on behalf of the plan. 492 (b)âThe plan of operation must shall include provision for: 493 1.âEstablishment of necessary facilities; 494 2.âManagement of the funds collected on behalf of the plan; 495 3.âProcessing of claims against the plan; 496 4.âAssessment of the persons and entities listed in 497 subsections (4) and (7) (5) to pay awards and expenses, which 498 assessments shall be on an actuarially sound basis subject to 499 the limits set forth in subsections (4) and (5); 500 5. A fraud and overpayment prevention and detection 501 program; and 502 6.5.âAny other matters necessary for the efficient 503 operation of the Florida Birth-Related Neurological Injury 504 Compensation Plan. 505 (b)âAmendments to the plan of operation may be made by the 506 directors of the plan, subject to the approval of the office of 507 Insurance Regulation of the Financial Services Commission. 508 (3)âAll assessments shall be deposited with the Florida 509 Birth-Related Neurological Injury Compensation association. The 510 funds collected by the association and any income therefrom 511 shall be disbursed only for the payment of awards under ss. 512 766.301-766.316 and for the payment of the reasonable expenses 513 of administering the plan. 514 (4)âThe following persons and entities shall pay into the 515 association assessments as follows an initial assessment in 516 accordance with the plan of operation: 517 (a)1.âOn or before October 1, 1988, Each hospital licensed 518 under chapter 395 shall pay an initial assessment of $50 per 519 infant delivered in that the hospital during the prior calendar 520 year, as reported to the Agency for Health Care Administration; 521 provided, however, that a hospital owned or operated by the 522 state or a county, special taxing district, or other political 523 subdivision of the state shall not be required to pay the 524 initial assessment or any assessment required by this subsection 525 or subsection (7) (5). The term âinfant deliveredâ includes live 526 births and not stillbirths, but the term does not include 527 infants delivered by employees or agents of the board of 528 trustees of a state university, those born in a teaching 529 hospital as defined in s. 408.07, or those born in a teaching 530 hospital as defined in s. 395.806 that have been deemed by the 531 association as being exempt from assessments since fiscal year 532 1997 to fiscal year 2001. The initial assessment and any 533 assessment imposed pursuant to subsection (7) (5) may not 534 include any infant born to a charity patient (as defined by rule 535 of the Agency for Health Care Administration) or born to a 536 patient for whom the hospital receives Medicaid reimbursement, 537 if the sum of the annual charges for charity patients plus the 538 annual Medicaid contractuals of the hospital exceeds 10 percent 539 of the total annual gross operating revenues of the hospital. 540 The hospital is responsible for documenting, to the satisfaction 541 of the association, the exclusion of any birth from the 542 computation of the assessment. Upon demonstration of financial 543 need by a hospital, the association may provide for installment 544 payments of assessments. 545 2.âAssessments are due, and hospitals shall pay all 546 assessments required under this section, by December 31 of the 547 calendar year immediately subsequent to the birth year. 548 (b)1.a.âOn or before October 15, 1988, All physicians 549 licensed pursuant to chapter 458 or chapter 459 as of October 1, 550 1988, other than participating physicians, shall be assessed an 551 annual initial assessment of $250., 552 b.âPayment for all assessments required under this 553 paragraph is due on or before December 31 of each year which 554 must be paid no later than December 1, 1988. 555 2.âAny such physician who becomes licensed after September 556 30, 1988, and before January 1, 1989, shall pay into the 557 association an initial assessment of $250 upon licensure. 558 3.âAny such physician who becomes licensed on or after 559 January 1, 1989, shall pay an initial assessment equal to the 560 most recent assessment made pursuant to this paragraph, 561 paragraph (5)(a), or paragraph (7)(b). 562 2.4.âHowever, if the physician is a physician specified in 563 this subparagraph, the assessment is not applicable: 564 a.âA resident physician, assistant resident physician, or 565 intern in an approved postgraduate training program, as defined 566 by the Board of Medicine or the Board of Osteopathic Medicine by 567 rule; 568 b.âA retired physician who has withdrawn from the practice 569 of medicine but who maintains an active license as evidenced by 570 an affidavit filed with the Department of Health. Prior to 571 reentering the practice of medicine in this state, a retired 572 physician as herein defined must notify the Board of Medicine or 573 the Board of Osteopathic Medicine and pay the appropriate 574 assessments pursuant to this section; 575 c.âA physician who holds a limited license pursuant to s. 576 458.317 and who is not being compensated for medical services; 577 d.âA physician who is employed full time by the United 578 States Department of Veterans Affairs and whose practice is 579 confined to United States Department of Veterans Affairs 580 hospitals; or 581 e.âA physician who is a member of the Armed Forces of the 582 United States and who meets the requirements of s. 456.024. 583 f.âA physician who is employed full time by the State of 584 Florida and whose practice is confined to state-owned 585 correctional institutions, a county health department, or state 586 owned mental health or developmental services facilities, or who 587 is employed full time by the Department of Health. 588 (c)1.âOn or before December 1, 1988, Each physician 589 licensed pursuant to chapter 458 or chapter 459 who wishes to 590 participate in the Florida Birth-Related Neurological Injury 591 Compensation Plan and who otherwise qualifies as a participating 592 physician under ss. 766.301-766.316 shall pay an annual initial 593 assessment of $5,000 and any assessment required under paragraph 594 (7)(c), if assessed. However, if the physician is either a 595 resident physician, assistant resident physician, or intern in 596 an approved postgraduate training program, as defined by the 597 Board of Medicine or the Board of Osteopathic Medicine by rule, 598 and is supervised in accordance with program requirements 599 established by the Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical 600 Education or the American Osteopathic Association by a physician 601 who is participating in the plan, such resident physician, 602 assistant resident physician, or intern is deemed to be a 603 participating physician without the payment of the assessment. 604 Participating physicians also include any employee of the board 605 of trustees of a state university who has paid the assessment 606 required by this paragraph and, if assessed, paragraph (7)(c) 607 (5)(a), and any certified nurse midwife supervised by such 608 employee. Participating physicians include any certified nurse 609 midwife who has paid 50 percent of the physician assessment 610 required by this paragraph and, if assessed, paragraph (7)(c), 611 (5)(a) and who is supervised by a participating physician who 612 has paid the assessment required by this paragraph and, if 613 assessed, paragraph (7)(c) (5)(a). Supervision for nurse 614 midwives shall require that the supervising physician will be 615 easily available and have a prearranged plan of treatment for 616 specified patient problems which the supervised certified nurse 617 midwife may carry out in the absence of any complicating 618 features. Any physician who elects to participate in such plan 619 on or after January 1, 1989, who was not a participating 620 physician at the time of such election to participate and who 621 otherwise qualifies as a participating physician under ss. 622 766.301-766.316 shall pay an additional initial assessment equal 623 to the most recent assessment made pursuant to this paragraph, 624 paragraph (5)(a), or paragraph (7)(b). 625 2.âPayment of assessments required by this paragraph is due 626 on or before December 31 of each year for qualification as a 627 participating physician during the next calendar year. If 628 payment of the assessments is received by the association on or 629 before January 31 of any calendar year, the physician shall 630 qualify as a participating physician for that entire calendar 631 year. If the payment is received after January 31, the physician 632 shall qualify as a participating physician for that calendar 633 year only from the date the payment was received by the 634 association. 635 (d)âAny hospital located in a county with a population in 636 excess of 1.1 million as of January 1, 2003, as determined by 637 the Agency for Health Care Administration under the Health Care 638 Responsibility Act, may elect to pay the assessments required by 639 paragraph (c) fee for the participating physician and the 640 certified nurse midwife if the hospital first determines that 641 the primary motivating purpose for making such payment is to 642 ensure coverage for the hospitalâs patients under the provisions 643 of ss. 766.301-766.316; however, no hospital may restrict any 644 participating physician or nurse midwife, directly or 645 indirectly, from being on the staff of hospitals other than the 646 staff of the hospital making the payment. Each hospital shall 647 file with the association an affidavit setting forth 648 specifically the reasons why the hospital elected to make the 649 payment on behalf of each participating physician and certified 650 nurse midwife. The payments authorized under this paragraph 651 shall be in addition to the assessment set forth in paragraph 652 (5)(a). 653 (5)(a)âBeginning January 1, 1990, the persons and entities 654 listed in paragraphs (4)(b) and (c), except those persons or 655 entities who are specifically excluded from said provisions, as 656 of the date determined in accordance with the plan of operation, 657 taking into account persons licensed subsequent to the payment 658 of the initial assessment, shall pay an annual assessment in the 659 amount equal to the initial assessments provided in paragraphs 660 (4)(b) and (c). If payment of the annual assessment by a 661 physician is received by the association by January 31 of any 662 calendar year, the physician shall qualify as a participating 663 physician for that entire calendar year. If the payment is 664 received after January 31 of any calendar year, the physician 665 shall qualify as a participating physician for that calendar 666 year only from the date the payment was received by the 667 association. On January 1, 1991, and on each January 1 668 thereafter, the association shall determine the amount of 669 additional assessments necessary pursuant to subsection (7), in 670 the manner required by the plan of operation, subject to any 671 increase determined to be necessary by the Office of Insurance 672 Regulation pursuant to paragraph (7)(b). On July 1, 1991, and on 673 each July 1 thereafter, the persons and entities listed in 674 paragraphs (4)(b) and (c), except those persons or entities who 675 are specifically excluded from said provisions, shall pay the 676 additional assessments which were determined on January 1. 677 Beginning January 1, 1990, the entities listed in paragraph 678 (4)(a), including those licensed on or after October 1, 1988, 679 shall pay an annual assessment of $50 per infant delivered 680 during the prior calendar year. The additional assessments which 681 were determined on January 1, 1991, pursuant to the provisions 682 of subsection (7) shall not be due and payable by the entities 683 listed in paragraph (4)(a) until July 1. 684 (b)âIf the assessments collected pursuant to subsection (4) 685 and the appropriation of funds provided by s. 76, chapter 88-1, 686 Laws of Florida, as amended by s. 41, chapter 88-277, Laws of 687 Florida, to the plan from the Insurance Regulatory Trust Fund 688 are insufficient to maintain the plan on an actuarially sound 689 basis, there is hereby appropriated for transfer to the 690 association from the Insurance Regulatory Trust Fund an 691 additional amount of up to $20 million. 692 (c)1.âTaking into account the assessments collected 693 pursuant to subsection (4) and appropriations from the Insurance 694 Regulatory Trust Fund, if required to maintain the plan on an 695 actuarially sound basis, the Office of Insurance Regulation 696 shall require each entity licensed to issue casualty insurance 697 as defined in s. 624.605(1)(b), (k), and (q) to pay into the 698 association an annual assessment in an amount determined by the 699 office pursuant to paragraph (7)(a), in the manner required by 700 the plan of operation. 701 2.âAll annual assessments shall be made on the basis of net 702 direct premiums written for the business activity which forms 703 the basis for each such entityâs inclusion as a funding source 704 for the plan in the state during the prior year ending December 705 31, as reported to the Office of Insurance Regulation, and shall 706 be in the proportion that the net direct premiums written by 707 each carrier on account of the business activity forming the 708 basis for its inclusion in the plan bears to the aggregate net 709 direct premiums for all such business activity written in this 710 state by all such entities. 711 3.âNo entity listed in this paragraph shall be individually 712 liable for an annual assessment in excess of 0.25 percent of 713 that entityâs net direct premiums written. 714 4.âCasualty insurance carriers shall be entitled to recover 715 their initial and annual assessments through a surcharge on 716 future policies, a rate increase applicable prospectively, or a 717 combination of the two. 718 (5)(6)(a)âThe association shall make all assessments 719 required by this section, except initial assessments of 720 physicians newly licensed by the Department of Health, which 721 assessments will be made by the Department of Health, and except 722 assessments of casualty insurers pursuant to paragraph (7)(c) 723 subparagraph (5)(c)1., which assessments will be made by the 724 office of Insurance Regulation. The Department of Health shall 725 provide the association, in an electronic format, with a monthly 726 report of the names and license numbers of all physicians 727 licensed under chapter 458 or chapter 459. 728 (b)1.âThe association may enforce collection of assessments 729 required to be paid pursuant to ss. 766.301-766.316 by suit 730 filed in county court, or in circuit court if the amount due 731 could exceed the jurisdictional limits of county court. The 732 association is entitled to an award of attorney fees, costs, and 733 interest upon the entry of a judgment against a physician for 734 failure to pay such assessment, with such interest accruing 735 until paid. Notwithstanding chapters 47 and 48, the association 736 may file such suit in either Leon County or the county of the 737 residence of the defendant. The association shall notify the 738 Department of Health and the applicable board of any unpaid 739 final judgment against a physician within 7 days after the entry 740 of final judgment. 741 2.âThe Department of Health, upon notification by the 742 association that an assessment has not been paid and that there 743 is an unsatisfied judgment against a physician, shall refuse to 744 renew any license issued to such physician under chapter 458 or 745 chapter 459 until the association notifies the Department of 746 Health that the judgment is satisfied in full. 747 (c)âThe Agency for Health Care Administration shall, upon 748 notification by the association that an assessment has not been 749 timely paid, enforce collection of such assessments required to 750 be paid by hospitals pursuant to ss. 766.301-766.316. Failure of 751 a hospital to pay such assessment is grounds for disciplinary 752 action pursuant to s. 395.1065 notwithstanding any law to the 753 contrary. 754 (6)(9)(a)âWithin 60 days after a claim is filed, the 755 association shall estimate the present value of the total cost 756 of the claim, including the estimated amount to be paid to the 757 claimant, the claimantâs attorney, the attorneyâs fees of the 758 association incident to the claim, and any other expenses that 759 are reasonably anticipated to be incurred by the association in 760 connection with the adjudication and payment of the claim. For 761 purposes of this estimate, the association should include the 762 maximum benefits for noneconomic damages. 763 (b)âThe association shall revise these estimates quarterly 764 based upon the actual costs incurred and any additional 765 information that becomes available to the association since the 766 last review of this estimate. The estimate shall be reduced by 767 any amounts paid by the association that were included in the 768 current estimate. The association must submit such quarterly 769 estimates to the office within 15 business days after 770 completion. 771 (c)âAfter the revisions of estimates required under 772 paragraph (b), each quarter, the association shall calculate 773 whether the plan is actuarially sound. If the associationâs 774 calculation indicates that the plan is not actuarially sound, 775 the association shall immediately notify the office as described 776 in subsection (7). The office must review the associationâs 777 calculations and, within 60 days after the associationâs 778 notification, determine whether to initiate an actuarial 779 valuation as described in subsection (7), and notify the 780 association of its determination. At a minimum, the office shall 781 make its determination based on the degree to which the 782 associationâs calculations indicate that the plan is not 783 actuarially sound, the direction and consistency of recent 784 trends in the calculations of the planâs actuarial soundness, 785 and the length of time since the most recent actuarial valuation 786 conducted by the office and until the next biennial valuation. 787 The office shall initiate such actuarial valuation within 30 788 days after its determination that there is a need for a 789 valuation. 790 1.âIf the total of all current estimates equals or exceeds 791 100 percent of the funds on hand and the funds that will become 792 available to the association within the next 12 months from all 793 sources described in subsection (4) and paragraph (5)(a), the 794 association may not accept any new claims without express 795 authority from the Legislature. This section does not preclude 796 the association from accepting any claim if the injury occurred 797 18 months or more before the effective date of this suspension. 798 Within 30 days after the effective date of this suspension, the 799 association shall notify the Governor, the Speaker of the House 800 of Representatives, the President of the Senate, the Office of 801 Insurance Regulation, the Agency for Health Care Administration, 802 and the Department of Health of this suspension. 803 2.âNotwithstanding this paragraph, the association is 804 authorized to accept new claims during the 2025-2026 fiscal year 805 if the total of all current estimates exceeds the limits 806 described in subparagraph 1. during that fiscal year. This 807 subparagraph expires July 1, 2026. 808 (d)âIf any person is precluded from asserting a claim 809 against the association because of paragraph (c), the plan shall 810 not constitute the exclusive remedy for such person, his or her 811 personal representative, parents, dependents, or next of kin. 812 (7)(a)âThe office of Insurance Regulation shall undertake 813 an actuarial investigation of the requirements of the plan based 814 on the planâs experience in the first year of operation and any 815 additional relevant information, including without limitation 816 the assets and liabilities of the plan. Pursuant to such 817 investigation, the Office of Insurance Regulation shall 818 establish the rate of contribution of the entities listed in 819 paragraph (5)(c) for the tax year beginning January 1, 1990. 820 Following the initial valuation, the Office of Insurance 821 Regulation shall cause an actuarial valuation to be made of the 822 assets and liabilities of the plan at a minimum no less 823 frequently than biennially on or before December 31 of even 824 numbered years and as provided in subsection (6). Such valuation 825 shall be based on the assets and liabilities of the plan for the 826 calendar year before the year in which the actuarial valuation 827 is due. The office shall also determine whether the plan has 828 adequate estimated cash flow for the following fiscal year, 829 whether, based on the actuarial valuation, the plan is 830 actuarially sound, and if not, whether the plan is likely to 831 return to actuarial soundness before the next biennial review. 832 Pursuant to the results of such valuations, the Office of 833 Insurance Regulation shall prepare a statement as to the 834 contribution rate applicable to the entities listed in paragraph 835 (5)(c). However, at no time shall the rate be greater than 0.25 836 percent of net direct premiums written. 837 (b)âIf the office determines that the plan lacks adequate 838 cash flow for the following fiscal year pursuant to the review 839 in paragraph (a), the office shall authorize transfers from the 840 Insurance Regulatory Trust Fund to the association within 30 841 calendar days. Cumulative transfers authorized under this 842 paragraph may not exceed $20 million over the life of the plan. 843 (c)(b)âIf the office of Insurance Regulation finds that the 844 plan is not likely to return to actuarial soundness before the 845 next biennial review pursuant to the review in paragraph (a), 846 the office shall, within 60 calendar days after this finding, 847 order one or more of the following actions: 848 1.âRequire each entity licensed to issue casualty insurance 849 as defined in s. 624.605(1)(b), (k), and (q) to pay into the 850 association an annual assessment that is calculated to generate 851 a total amount no greater than the amount required to achieve 852 actuarial soundness of the plan within 5 years after the date of 853 the order, subject to the limitations of this subparagraph. 854 a.âSuch assessments shall be made on the basis of net 855 direct premiums written for the business activity which forms 856 the basis for each such entityâs inclusion as a funding source 857 for the plan in the state during the prior year ending December 858 31, as reported to the office, and shall be in the proportion 859 that the net direct premiums written by each carrier on account 860 of the business activity forming the basis for its inclusion in 861 the plan bears to the aggregate net direct premiums for all such 862 business activity written in this state by all such entities. 863 b.âNo entity shall be individually liable for an annual 864 assessment in excess of 0.25 percent of that entityâs net direct 865 premiums written. 866 c.âCasualty insurance carriers shall be entitled to recover 867 their assessments through a surcharge on future policies, a rate 868 increase applicable prospectively, or a combination of the two. 869 d.âAn assessment under this subparagraph must not extend 5 870 years after the date of the order. 871 2.âIf actuarial soundness cannot be achieved after using 872 the remedy in subparagraph 1., increase the assessments 873 specified in subsection (4) on a proportional basis that is 874 calculated to generate a total amount no greater than the amount 875 required to maintain the plan on an actuarially sound basis. 876 (d)âIf the office finds that the plan is not actuarially 877 sound pursuant to the review in paragraph (a), the plan shall 878 provide the office with quarterly reports projecting the planâs 879 financial condition and, if assessments were ordered by the 880 office under this subsection, projected revenues for such 881 assessments. 882 (e)âIf the office finds that the plan is not actuarially 883 sound and the remedies provided under this subsection are 884 insufficient to reestablish the actuarial soundness of the plan, 885 the association shall, within 5 days after such finding, notify 886 the Governor, the President of the Senate, the Speaker of the 887 House of Representatives, and the office. If the notice is 888 issued, the association may not accept any new claims without 889 express authority from the Legislature. This paragraph does not 890 preclude the association from accepting any claim if the injury 891 occurred 18 months or more before the effective date of this 892 suspension. 893 (f)âIf any person is precluded from asserting a claim 894 against the association because of paragraph (e), the plan shall 895 not constitute the exclusive remedy for such person, his or her 896 personal representative, parents, dependents, or next of kin 897 cannot be maintained on an actuarially sound basis based on the 898 assessments and appropriations listed in subsections (4) and 899 (5), the office shall increase the assessments specified in 900 subsection (4) on a proportional basis as needed. 901 (8)âThe association shall report to the Legislature its 902 determination as to the annual cost of maintaining the fund on 903 an actuarially sound basis. In making its determination, the 904 association shall consider the recommendations of all hospitals, 905 physicians, casualty insurers, attorneys, consumers, and any 906 associations representing any such person or entity. 907 Notwithstanding the provisions of s. 395.3025, all hospitals, 908 casualty insurers, departments, boards, commissions, and 909 legislative committees shall provide the association with all 910 relevant records and information upon request to assist the 911 association in making its determination. All hospitals shall, 912 upon request by the association, provide the association with 913 information from their records regarding any live birth. Such 914 information shall not include the name of any physician, the 915 name of any hospital employee or agent, the name of the patient, 916 or any other information which will identify the infant involved 917 in the birth. Such information thereby obtained shall be 918 utilized solely for the purpose of assisting the association and 919 shall not subject the hospital to any civil or criminal 920 liability for the release thereof. Such information shall 921 otherwise be confidential and exempt from the provisions of s. 922 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 923 Section 8.âPresent subsections (5) through (8) of section 924 766.315, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (6) 925 through (9), respectively, a new subsection (5) is added to that 926 section, and subsection (1), paragraph (e) of present subsection 927 (5), and present subsections (7) and (8) of that section are 928 amended, to read: 929 766.315âFlorida Birth-Related Neurological Injury 930 Compensation Association; board of directors; notice of 931 meetings; report.â 932 (1)(a)âThe Florida Birth-Related Neurological Injury 933 Compensation Plan shall be governed by a board of seven 934 directors which shall be known as the Florida Birth-Related 935 Neurological Injury Compensation Association. The association is 936 not a state agency, board, or commission. Notwithstanding the 937 provision of s. 15.03, the association is authorized to use the 938 state seal. 939 (b)âThe directors shall be appointed for staggered terms of 940 3 years or until their successors are appointed and have 941 qualified; however, a director may not serve for more than 6 942 consecutive years. 943 (c)âThe directors shall be appointed by the Chief Financial 944 Officer as follows: 945 1.âOne citizen representative who is not affiliated with 946 any of the groups identified in subparagraphs 2.-7. 947 2.âOne representative of participating physicians. 948 3.âOne representative of hospitals. 949 4.âOne representative of casualty insurers. 950 5.âOne representative of physicians other than 951 participating physicians. 952 6.âOne family member of a participant parent or legal 953 guardian representative of an injured infant under the plan. 954 7.âOne representative of an advocacy organization for 955 children with disabilities. 956 (5)âNotwithstanding this section, the board of directors 957 may not create new benefits or expand existing benefits that 958 result in additional costs to the plan if the plan is operating 959 at an annual cash flow deficit, as documented in the planâs 960 audited financial statements for the prior fiscal year. This 961 subsection does not prohibit the plan from providing benefits 962 set forth in s. 766.31. 963 (6)(5)â 964 (e)âAnnually, the association shall furnish audited 965 financial reports to any plan participant upon request, to the 966 office of Insurance Regulation of the Financial Services 967 Commission, and to the Joint Legislative Auditing Committee. The 968 reports must be prepared in accordance with generally accepted 969 auditing standards accounting procedures and must include such 970 information as may be required by the office of Insurance 971 Regulation or the Joint Legislative Auditing Committee. At any 972 time determined to be necessary, the office of Insurance 973 Regulation or the Joint Legislative Auditing Committee may 974 conduct an audit of the plan. 975 (8)(7)âThe association shall publish a report on its 976 website by January 1 of each year. The report must shall include 977 all of the following: 978 (a)âThe names and terms of each board member and executive 979 staff member. 980 (b)âThe amount of compensation paid to each association 981 employee or independent contractor. 982 (c)âA summary of reimbursement disputes and resolutions. 983 (d)âA list of expenditures for attorney fees and lobbying 984 fees. 985 (e)âOther expenses to oppose each plan claim. Any personal 986 identifying information of the parent, legal guardian, or child 987 involved in the claim must be removed from this list. 988 (9)(8)âBy November 1 of each year, the association shall 989 submit a report to the Governor, the President of the Senate, 990 the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the Chief 991 Financial Officer. The report must include all of the following: 992 (a)âThe number of petitions filed for compensation with the 993 division, the number of claimants awarded compensation, the 994 number of claimants denied compensation, and the reasons for the 995 denial of compensation. 996 (b)âThe number and dollar amount of paid and denied 997 compensation for expenses by category and the reasons for any 998 denied compensation for expenses by category. 999 (c)âThe average turnaround time for paying or denying 1000 compensation for expenses. 1001 (d)âLegislative recommendations to improve the program, 1002 including to create new benefits or expand current benefits for 1003 participants. Recommendations creating new benefits or expanding 1004 current benefits must include estimates of the costs to the plan 1005 for providing such benefits on an annual basis. 1006 (e)âA summary of any pending or resolved litigation during 1007 the year which affects the plan. 1008 (f)âThe amount of compensation paid to each association 1009 employee, independent contractor, or member of the board of 1010 directors. 1011 Section 9.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.